Washington statutes.
RCW 19.158.180

Attorney general to provide and maintain a web page.

The office of the attorney general shall provide and maintain a web page informing the public of the laws and regulations governing telephone solicitation, including the provisions of this chapter and RCW 80.36.390, and the legal rights of those who receive telephone solicitations; and provide information on how members of the public may file a complaint for violations of the laws and regulations governing telephone solicitation.

[ 2022 c 195 s 4.]